Louisiana, session 2026, HB964.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The commissioner of administration, notwithstanding any other provision
of law to the contrary, is hereby authorized and empowered to convey, transfer, assign, lease
or deliver any interest, excluding mineral rights, the state may have to all or any portion of
the following described parcel of property to Francis Michael Hale:
A certain tract of land in Sections 12 and 13, T20N, R16W, Caddo Parish, Louisiana,
belonging to the State of Louisiana, lying below the 173.09 foot contour, comprised
of approximately two (2) acres, more or less, being that parcel of land situated
between the land now owned by Francis Michael Hale and the water's edge of Caddo
Lake.
Section 2. The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized to enter into
such agreements, covenants, conditions, and stipulations and to execute such documents as
necessary to properly effectuate any conveyance, transfer, assignment, lease or delivery of
title, excluding mineral rights, to the property described in Section 1 of this Act, and as more
specifically described in any such agreements entered into and documents executed by and
between the commissioner of administration and Francis Michael Hale, in exchange for
consideration proportionate to the appraised value of the property.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 964 ENROLLED
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.